Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB701.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3532 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3532. Expenses.The Office of the Court Administrator of Pennsylvania shall pay the annual registration fee of [$200] $400 to the Special Court Judges [of Pennsylvania] Association of Pennsylvania for each magisterial district judge[,] and Philadelphia Municipal Court Judge [and Philadelphia Traffic Court Judge position] authorized as of January 31 of each year. Payment shall be made on the first day of a new fiscal year including July 1, 1988. In addition the Office of the Court Administrator of Pennsylvania shall pay the annual cost for the publishing of a monthly journal containing the update and revision of laws and State 123456789101112131415161718 Supreme Court rule changes. Except for the funding of the publication of the monthly journal which shall be a direct cost of the Office of the Court Administrator of Pennsylvania, all other funding for the other expenses set forth in this section shall come from the annual appropriation made to the magisterial district judges.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0701PN0713 - 2 - 1234567